utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 тел .
SFX 373 Y 1
SFX 373 0 тен .
SFX 4758 Y 1
SFX 4758 0 орените .
SFX 2998 Y 1
SFX 2998 0 дник .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 0 ајќи .
SFX 762 Y 1
SFX 762 0 вица .
SFX 2883 Y 1
SFX 2883 0 вици .
SFX 1783 Y 1
SFX 1783 0 рност .
SFX 3678 Y 1
SFX 3678 0 овноно .
SFX 4254 Y 1
SFX 4254 0 зниве .
SFX 4768 Y 1
SFX 4768 0 имовска .
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 0 циве .
SFX 4411 Y 1
SFX 4411 0 имовски .
SFX 657 Y 1
SFX 657 0 ецот .
SFX 4348 Y 1
SFX 4348 0 рли .
SFX 4682 Y 1
SFX 4682 0 екувањата .
SFX 2106 Y 1
SFX 2106 0 нив .
SFX 1260 Y 1
SFX 1260 0 ние .
SFX 4079 Y 1
SFX 4079 0 нии .
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 0 ник .
SFX 1858 Y 1
SFX 1858 0 нил .
SFX 2897 Y 1
SFX 2897 0 нин .
SFX 4285 Y 1
SFX 4285 0 ојат .
SFX 1437 Y 1
SFX 1437 0 нење .
SFX 4734 Y 1
SFX 4734 0 екувавме .
SFX 1851 Y 1
SFX 1851 0 дева .
SFX 2040 Y 1
SFX 2040 0 деви .
SFX 3670 Y 1
SFX 3670 0 тувате .
SFX 3327 Y 1
SFX 3327 0 сова .
SFX 1795 Y 1
SFX 1795 0 сови .
SFX 1658 Y 1
SFX 1658 0 ивниот .
SFX 1124 Y 1
SFX 1124 0 чната .
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 0 вари .
SFX 57 Y 1
SFX 57 0 ниве .
SFX 583 Y 1
SFX 583 0 изира .
SFX 2545 Y 1
SFX 2545 0 чувате .
SFX 4075 Y 1
SFX 4075 0 оши .
SFX 4880 Y 1
SFX 4880 0 ткаат .
SFX 3220 Y 1
SFX 3220 0 жувавте .
SFX 1657 Y 1
SFX 1657 0 иската .
SFX 3739 Y 1
SFX 3739 0 елија .
SFX 1120 Y 1
SFX 1120 0 коно .
SFX 3254 Y 1
SFX 3254 0 ковите .
SFX 3992 Y 1
SFX 3992 0 ворен .
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 0 нската .
SFX 2099 Y 1
SFX 2099 0 атор .
SFX 2323 Y 1
SFX 2323 0 атот .
SFX 4177 Y 1
SFX 4177 0 редува .
SFX 3122 Y 1
SFX 3122 0 ована .
SFX 2612 Y 1
SFX 2612 0 рлив .
SFX 3719 Y 1
SFX 3719 0 шевме .
SFX 2343 Y 1
SFX 2343 0 бов .
SFX 1027 Y 1
SFX 1027 0 натата .
SFX 912 Y 1
SFX 912 0 ирајте .
SFX 2599 Y 1
SFX 2599 0 дуваа .
SFX 2847 Y 1
SFX 2847 0 дував .
SFX 2598 Y 1
SFX 2598 0 дувал .
SFX 2846 Y 1
SFX 2846 0 дувам .
SFX 4546 Y 1
SFX 4546 0 дуван .
SFX 1949 Y 1
SFX 1949 0 етово .
SFX 2867 Y 1
SFX 2867 0 сете .
SFX 3426 Y 1
SFX 3426 0 аденана .
SFX 3313 Y 1
SFX 3313 0 алова .
SFX 3537 Y 1
SFX 3537 0 алови .
SFX 4590 Y 1
SFX 4590 0 олка .
SFX 909 Y 1
SFX 909 0 лност .
SFX 4326 Y 1
SFX 4326 0 асни .
SFX 3055 Y 1
SFX 3055 0 штвото .
SFX 1039 Y 1
SFX 1039 0 рањана .
SFX 4985 Y 1
SFX 4985 0 злив .
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 ња .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 ње .
SFX 4665 Y 1
SFX 4665 0 њи .
SFX 3608 Y 1
SFX 3608 0 ипи .
SFX 3231 Y 1
SFX 3231 0 еченана .
SFX 3825 Y 1
SFX 3825 0 ожи .
SFX 1663 Y 1
SFX 1663 0 кајте .
SFX 3413 Y 1
SFX 3413 0 анскава .
SFX 4404 Y 1
SFX 4404 0 ничкиов .
SFX 4743 Y 1
SFX 4743 0 дуваниве .
SFX 4403 Y 1
SFX 4403 0 ничкион .
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 0 ушев .
SFX 4039 Y 1
SFX 4039 0 иете .
SFX 1914 Y 1
SFX 1914 0 ието .
SFX 3625 Y 1
SFX 3625 0 шувањено .
SFX 4208 Y 1
SFX 4208 0 еанана .
SFX 2591 Y 1
SFX 2591 0 носен .
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 0 шник .
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 0 ист .
SFX 1887 Y 1
SFX 1887 0 ливава .
SFX 1162 Y 1
SFX 1162 0 жува .
SFX 4137 Y 1
SFX 4137 0 инскана .
SFX 3797 Y 1
SFX 3797 0 енче .
SFX 3474 Y 1
SFX 3474 0 канана .
SFX 2617 Y 1
SFX 2617 0 лиев .
SFX 764 Y 1
SFX 764 0 мир .
SFX 369 Y 1
SFX 369 0 нска .
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 нски .
SFX 751 Y 1
SFX 751 0 нско .
SFX 1957 Y 1
SFX 1957 0 вниов .
SFX 1956 Y 1
SFX 1956 0 внион .
SFX 549 Y 1
SFX 549 0 ирањето .
SFX 1897 Y 1
SFX 1897 0 дната .
SFX 3076 Y 1
SFX 3076 0 кањата .
SFX 142 Y 1
SFX 142 0 ница .
SFX 170 Y 1
SFX 170 0 ници .
SFX 4124 Y 1
SFX 4124 0 нството .
SFX 3903 Y 1
SFX 3903 0 чавиот .
SFX 3017 Y 1
SFX 3017 0 кос .
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 0 кот .
SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304 0 ичка .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 ички .
SFX 863 Y 1
SFX 863 0 ичко .
SFX 1545 Y 1
SFX 1545 0 итиот .
SFX 3513 Y 1
SFX 3513 0 туваа .
SFX 3959 Y 1
SFX 3959 0 тував .
SFX 3720 Y 1
SFX 3720 0 тувал .
SFX 3512 Y 1
SFX 3512 0 тувам .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 вме .
SFX 1834 Y 1
SFX 1834 0 ерува .
SFX 802 Y 1
SFX 802 0 нуваме .
SFX 819 Y 1
SFX 819 0 нувате .
SFX 3348 Y 1
SFX 3348 0 еана .
SFX 3802 Y 1
SFX 3802 0 еани .
SFX 3801 Y 1
SFX 3801 0 еано .
SFX 4544 Y 1
SFX 4544 0 еавте .
SFX 3444 Y 1
SFX 3444 0 тскава .
SFX 2381 Y 1
SFX 2381 0 алниов .
SFX 2380 Y 1
SFX 2380 0 алнион .
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 0 овите .
SFX 4520 Y 1
SFX 4520 0 овито .
SFX 4013 Y 1
SFX 4013 0 шаат .
SFX 3852 Y 1
SFX 3852 0 чуваноно .
SFX 2601 Y 1
SFX 2601 0 ачува .
SFX 3804 Y 1
SFX 3804 0 гија .
SFX 4514 Y 1
SFX 4514 0 ориме .
SFX 884 Y 1
SFX 884 0 ранине .
SFX 4315 Y 1
SFX 4315 0 енеа .
SFX 4618 Y 1
SFX 4618 0 енев .
SFX 4617 Y 1
SFX 4617 0 енел .
SFX 992 Y 1
SFX 992 0 рна .
SFX 4347 Y 1
SFX 4347 0 рне .
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 0 рни .
SFX 1033 Y 1
SFX 1033 0 рно .
SFX 4810 Y 1
SFX 4810 0 рираат .
SFX 3419 Y 1
SFX 3419 0 адените .
SFX 2427 Y 1
SFX 2427 0 учи .
SFX 1441 Y 1
SFX 1441 0 ации .
SFX 3283 Y 1
SFX 3283 0 рнува .
SFX 3406 Y 1
SFX 3406 0 ансконо .
SFX 203 Y 1
SFX 203 0 нка .
SFX 674 Y 1
SFX 674 0 нки .
SFX 1022 Y 1
SFX 1022 0 нко .
SFX 3224 Y 1
SFX 3224 0 ечените .
SFX 3252 Y 1
SFX 3252 0 овност .
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 0 анов .
SFX 4762 Y 1
SFX 4762 0 месечен .
SFX 864 Y 1
SFX 864 0 чов .
SFX 1184 Y 1
SFX 1184 0 чок .
SFX 2165 Y 1
SFX 2165 0 чон .
SFX 4277 Y 1
SFX 4277 0 риот .
SFX 4191 Y 1
SFX 4191 0 ледува .
SFX 3255 Y 1
SFX 3255 0 иштана .
SFX 4459 Y 1
SFX 4459 0 иената .
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 0 раме .
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 0 тниот .
SFX 3929 Y 1
SFX 3929 0 еаните .
SFX 1566 Y 1
SFX 1566 0 телниот .
SFX 1717 Y 1
SFX 1717 0 рниов .
SFX 1716 Y 1
SFX 1716 0 рнион .
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 0 скиве .
SFX 2153 Y 1
SFX 2153 0 иине .
SFX 2268 Y 1
SFX 2268 0 инските .
SFX 4111 Y 1
SFX 4111 0 сувањана .
SFX 2934 Y 1
SFX 2934 0 каните .
SFX 3334 Y 1
SFX 3334 0 ожен .
SFX 2920 Y 1
SFX 2920 0 жувајќи .
SFX 3052 Y 1
SFX 3052 0 видниот .
SFX 3991 Y 1
SFX 3991 0 евиве .
SFX 670 Y 1
SFX 670 0 ир .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 ис .
SFX 352 Y 1
SFX 352 0 ит .
SFX 1655 Y 1
SFX 1655 0 иу .
SFX 2529 Y 1
SFX 2529 0 иф .
SFX 4372 Y 1
SFX 4372 0 иц .
SFX 531 Y 1
SFX 531 0 ич .
SFX 215 Y 1
SFX 215 0 иш .
SFX 1004 Y 1
SFX 1004 0 иј .
SFX 97 Y 1
SFX 97 0 иќ .
SFX 4539 Y 1
SFX 4539 0 ивања .
SFX 2041 Y 1
SFX 2041 0 ават .
SFX 1546 Y 1
SFX 1546 0 ивање .
SFX 4906 Y 1
SFX 4906 0 нисти .
SFX 3284 Y 1
SFX 3284 0 пуваш .
SFX 3519 Y 1
SFX 3519 0 пувај .
SFX 4684 Y 1
SFX 4684 0 екувањава .
SFX 788 Y 1
SFX 788 0 нуваа .
SFX 862 Y 1
SFX 862 0 нував .
SFX 824 Y 1
SFX 824 0 нувал .
SFX 823 Y 1
SFX 823 0 нувам .
SFX 2010 Y 1
SFX 2010 0 нуван .
SFX 3437 Y 1
SFX 3437 0 тсконо .
SFX 474 Y 1
SFX 474 0 ањата .
SFX 3162 Y 1
SFX 3162 0 кост .
SFX 4764 Y 1
SFX 4764 0 катница .
SFX 1548 Y 1
SFX 1548 0 етине .
SFX 4828 Y 1
SFX 4828 0 иснува .
SFX 1395 Y 1
SFX 1395 0 чнава .
SFX 1969 Y 1
SFX 1969 0 каше .
SFX 4343 Y 1
SFX 4343 0 сле .
SFX 2146 Y 1
SFX 2146 0 стен .
SFX 2905 Y 1
SFX 2905 0 ќа .
SFX 2654 Y 1
SFX 2654 0 ќе .
SFX 73 Y 1
SFX 73 0 ќи .
SFX 3604 Y 1
SFX 3604 0 оил .
SFX 1321 Y 1
SFX 1321 0 ческа .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 чески .
SFX 4436 Y 1
SFX 4436 0 таната .
SFX 738 Y 1
SFX 738 0 шта .
SFX 325 Y 1
SFX 325 0 ште .
SFX 2152 Y 1
SFX 2152 0 илен .
SFX 3366 Y 1
SFX 3366 0 шти .
SFX 2892 Y 1
SFX 2892 0 што .
SFX 1776 Y 1
SFX 1776 0 денана .
SFX 3082 Y 1
SFX 3082 0 искава .
SFX 4274 Y 1
SFX 4274 0 тало .
SFX 3482 Y 1
SFX 3482 0 дисува .
SFX 2984 Y 1
SFX 2984 0 сник .
SFX 4779 Y 1
SFX 4779 0 ежување .
SFX 2011 Y 1
SFX 2011 0 кнете .
SFX 1143 Y 1
SFX 1143 0 чија .
SFX 3840 Y 1
SFX 3840 0 аса .
SFX 2524 Y 1
SFX 2524 0 аси .
SFX 1157 Y 1
SFX 1157 0 нскава .
SFX 1223 Y 1
SFX 1223 0 лниов .
SFX 1222 Y 1
SFX 1222 0 лнион .
SFX 1229 Y 1
SFX 1229 0 орот .
SFX 3051 Y 1
SFX 3051 0 елување .
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 0 оните .
SFX 1080 Y 1
SFX 1080 0 натава .
SFX 1086 Y 1
SFX 1086 0 ееја .
SFX 2917 Y 1
SFX 2917 0 увачите .
SFX 4843 Y 1
SFX 4843 0 екуваш .
SFX 4842 Y 1
SFX 4842 0 екувај .
SFX 4702 Y 1
SFX 4702 0 суванине .
SFX 2570 Y 1
SFX 2570 0 ативен .
SFX 1113 Y 1
SFX 1113 0 ичкине .
SFX 3994 Y 1
SFX 3994 0 аците .
SFX 3020 Y 1
SFX 3020 0 див .
SFX 2111 Y 1
SFX 2111 0 дил .
SFX 3150 Y 1
SFX 3150 0 јева .
SFX 675 Y 1
SFX 675 0 дин .
SFX 3326 Y 1
SFX 3326 0 јеви .
SFX 4945 Y 1
SFX 4945 0 ѓаат .
SFX 4882 Y 1
SFX 4882 0 тираш .
SFX 4881 Y 1
SFX 4881 0 тирај .
