utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
бин/2,3,9,14,21,25,26,28,30,34,36,50,80,81,87,88,95,107,108,121,131,154,164,194,215,525,526,534,539,556,581,655,728,805,961,1087,1261,1291,1462,1508,1518,1624,1851,2040,2057,2116,2158,2237,2321,2567,2696,2759,2809,3161,3267,3586,3833,4470,4969
рен/3,4,7,9,11,13,25,30,38,88,92,113,221,299,308,319,320,324,339,348,354,357,359,373,548,569,655,757,1396,1532,1539,1595,1851,2040,2567,2696,2757,2827,3375,3817
смо/4,83,85,90,92,156,330,622,760,795,1051,1243,1290,1308,1363,2208,2243,2428,2643,4880
мета/1620,1765,2051,2756,4079
чифт/2,7,81,719,922,1049,1185,3739
прид/266,334,949,1616,1617,1806,2525,2700,2885,2974,2983,3005,3006,3007,3317,3992,4061,4328,4391
акци/3,20,21,24,26,28,29,43,59,138,144,149,157,186,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,433,465,870,894,902,1180,1290,1346,1446,1610,1687,1784,1947,2050,2247,2596,2714,2761,3297,3528,3789,3793,4249,4250,4251,4252,4253,4254,4255,4518,4519,4611
опус/3,6,113,373,413,654,760,879,1051,1363,1583,1732,1904,4659,4806
сток/383,606,893,1084,1219,1329,1351,1608,1639,1739,1740,1797,1809,2003,2192,2198,2465,2489,2800,3678,3679,3680,3681,3682,3683,3684,3685
спор/4,59,69,91,232,314,315,502,506,606,760,853,935,1051,1363,1425,1792,2143,2187,2274,2365,2462,2683,3032,3277,3437,3438,3439,3440,3441,3442,3443,3444,3512,3670,4166,4167
отст/477,1654,1829,2454,3520,4061,4285
чове/50,90,92,100,104,153,156,180,194,303,313,330,332,336,349,377,380,488,489,492,493,526,534,589,618,648,813,891,936,938,1002,1042,1043,1044,1045,1124,1161,1216,1218,1255,1281,1388,1389,1390,1391,1392,1393,1394,1395,1511,1625,2208,3055,3254,4194
косо/502,3355,3742
саба/569,1000,2625,3819,4348
опши/7,10,19,22,31,32,33,37,40,54,59,61,70,80,102,143,152,163,165,169,171,173,174,175,178,184,188,196,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,331,342,414,430,457,459,678,867,931,958,992,1020,1033,1474,1490,1761,1783,1936,2000,2889,3062,4093,4748,4796,4797,4878
мило/7,103,107,108,121,131,148,288,290,469,605,737,939,1109,1146,1242,1378,1459,1673,1795,1828,1868,1985,2044,2120,2293,2701,2702,2703,2704,2705,2706,2707,2708,2829,2896,2984,3011,3327,3448,3483,3515,3846,4173,4638,4747,4985
молк/747,871,1437,2592,4644
бори/755,1146,1300,1563,1726,1795,2373,2896,2996,3327,3448,4173,4197,4307
пуст/881,1012,1094,1287,2061,2084,2116,2268,2359,3739,4075,4286,4316
осто/97
сераф/14,81,87,88,95,179,197,224,338,608,2877,4411,4768
појас/3,5,6,8,21,35,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,70,191,233,241,258,259,641,650,665,666,684,685,742,743,871,1493,1536,1742,1758,1800,1802,1858,1937,1938,1968,2071,2072,2073,2106,2123,2124,2193,2194,2195,2196,2197,2313,2614,2839,2840,4659
папра/757,2998,3136
стопа/989,1211,2213,2897,3846,4124
плеска/1,2,8,12,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,56,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,67,68,72,74,75,76,77,762,2883
пропаѓ/2,106,158,159,162,181,195,234,245,266,281,306,307,312,334,346,354,356,418,427,455,474,475,479,483,484
бруцош/2,3,6,14,20,21,26,28,50,83,89,153,167,192,327,329,360,367,496,783,936,1120,1121,1126
африка/25,203,255,369,661,667,674,734,751,774,786,911,1150,1151,1152,1153,1154,1155,1156,1157,1251,1339,1514,1631,1632,1723,1724,1831,2588,2589,2841,2842
енерги/3,21,26,28,59,377,433,648,813,891,902,938,1124,1161,1180,1218,1281,1290,1388,1389,1390,1391,1392,1393,1394,1395,1625
плачко/762
сенегал/24,29,50,83,85,138,144,149,157,167,177,186,192,213,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,327,329,360,367,657
радикал/3,5,6,8,21,24,29,35,47,51,52,55,70,109,177,421,490,583,645,657,765,807,1537
преврат/3,6,47,70,166,170,494,614
рафинер/93,350,391,1122,1128,1657,1824
разјасни/1,12,19,22,31,32,33,37,39,40,59,413,1167
резултат/2,3,6,8,14,20,21,24,26,28,29,47,70,89,109,138,144,149,157,186,189,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,269,352,1375,1658,2694
американ/9,24,29,50,83,85,138,144,149,157,167,177,186,192,213,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,327,329,360,367,421,496,583,603,604,645,657,765,807,1172,1241,1467,1764,3787
прикачува/1,2,5,8,12,13,18,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,56,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,67,68,72,74,75,76,77
самовоспита/13,1260
